Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1488
Registered lobbyist; statement of
activity during regular or special session; when filed.

Within
forty-five days after the completion of every
regular or special session of the Legislature, each registered lobbyist shall
submit electronically to
the Clerk of the Legislature a statement listing the legislation upon which
the lobbyist acted, including identification by number of any bill or resolution
and the position taken by the lobbyist.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 88;

Laws 1991, LB 232, § 5;

Laws 1994, LB 872, § 10;

Laws 1994, LB 1243, § 11;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 72.